Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 11.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,105
School files or records; provided upon
student's transfer.

A copy of a public or private
school's files or records concerning a student, including academic material and any disciplinary material
relating to any suspension or expulsion, shall be provided at
no charge, upon request, to any public or private school to which the student
transfers.

Laws 1986, LB 642, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,157.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 109;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 11.